test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-IA-miciso_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mîciso - ok : # Ordinary VAI verb "eat" - full paradigm
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mîcisow
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mîcisoyiwa
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimîcisonân
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimîcisonaw, kimîcisonânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimîcisonâwâw
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mîcisowak
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mîcisoyiwa
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mîcisoyân, êmîcisoyân]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mîcisoyan, êmîcisoyan]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mîcisot, êmîcisot]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-mîcisoyit, êmîcisoyit]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mîcisoyâhk, êmîcisoyâhk]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mîcisoyahk, êmîcisoyahk]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mîcisoyêk, êmîcisoyêk]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mîcisocik, êmîcisocik]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mîcisoyit, êmîcisoyit]

     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîciso
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcisok
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcisotân
  
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcisohkan
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcisohkêk
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcisohkahk
